Georgia statutes. TITLE 1 General Provisions
CHAPTER 5 Change of Name of Rapid Transit Authorities, Port Authorities, and Industrial Areas

1-5-1.
Power of board of directors to change name and style under which an authority operates.

The board of directors of any public authority created by a constitutional amendment, which amendment was continued in force as a part of the 1983 Constitution pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (d) of Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV, shall be empowered to change the name and style under which the authority operates by adopting an appropriate resolution by a majority vote at any regular or special meeting of the authority. If the board of directors changes the name and style under which an authority operates in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, such action shall in no way alter or restrict the character or nature of the authority and the authority shall be recognized and declared to be one and the same continuing body corporate and politic with all the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to said authority; and any acts done under the new name and style so adopted shall be for all intents and purposes equally as valid and effective as if done under the original name and style of the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 47, § 1.